Utah statutes.
7-17-6.   Liability of lender for failure to pay taxes, insurance premiums
or other charges.
A lender administering a reserve account shall make timely payments of taxes,
insurance premiums and other charges for which the account is established, if
funds paid into the account by the borrower, his successors or assigns, are
sufficient for the payments. Negligent failure to make the payments required
for taxes, insurance premiums and other charges as they become due, from
available funds in the reserve account, shall subject the lender to liability
for all damages directly resulting from the failure; provided that this
sentence shall not deprive the lender of the right to present any defense it
may have in any action brought to enforce the liability. Failure of the
borrower or his successors or assigns to deliver promptly to the lender all
notices of tax assessments and insurance premiums or other charges, received
by the borrower, his successors or assigns, shall relieve the lender from
liability under this section.
